Mississippi statutes. Title 51. Waters, Water Resources, Water Districts, Drainage, and Flood Control
Chapter 19. West Central Mississippi Waterway Commission
[Repealed]

§§ 51-19-1 through 51-19-15.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1997, ch. 403, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§51-19-1. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-301; Laws, 1966, ch. 281, § 1]

§51-19-3. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-302; Laws, 1966, ch. 281, § 2]

§51-19-5. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-303; Laws, 1966, ch. 281, § 3]

§51-19-7. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-304; Laws, 1966, ch. 281, § 4]

§51-19-9. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-305; Laws, 1966, ch. 281, § 5]

§51-19-11. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-306; Laws, 1966, ch. 281, § 6]

§51-19-13. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-307; Laws, 1966, ch. 281, § 7]

§51-19-15. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-308; Laws, 1966, ch. 281, § 8]